lexc/noun/enhunfxpp.lexc
!!!enhufxpp.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
! +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p +Posss3p +Posss1p +Posss2p +Possp3s 
! +Possp2s +Posss2s +Possp1s +Posss3s +Posss1s 

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ 
§oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §oeoez12§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ 
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

! szavak:
! enyéim
! enyém
! maga
! magad
! magam
! magatok
! maguk
! magunk
! mieink
! miéink
! mienk
! miénk
! övé
! övéi
! övéik
! övék
! övéké
! övüké
! tied
! tiéd
! tieid
! tiéid
! tieitek
! tiéitek
! tietek
! tiétek
! 
LEXICON Noun
enyém AddNounenyem; !birtokos névmás
tied AddNounenyem;
tiéd AddNounenyem;
övé AddNounenyem;
mienk AddNounenyem;
miénk AddNounenyem;
tietek AddNounenyem;
tiétek AddNounenyem;
övék AddNounenyem;
övüké AddNounenyem;
övéké AddNounenyem;
enyéim AddNounenyem; ! ugyanaz mint enyémek
tieid AddNounenyem;
tiéid AddNounenyem;
övéi AddNounenyem;
mieink AddNounenyem;
miéink AddNounenyem;
tieitek AddNounenyem;
tiéitek AddNounenyem;
övéik AddNounenyem;
jómagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
jómagad AddNounmagam;
jómaga AddNounmagam;
jómagunk AddNounmagam;
jómagatok AddNounmagam;
jómaguk AddNounmagam;
magam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
magad AddNounmagam;
maga AddNounmagam;
magunk AddNounmagam;
magatok AddNounmagam;
maguk AddNounmagam;
egymagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
egymagad AddNounmagam;
egymaga AddNounmagam;
egymagunk AddNounmagam;
egymagatok AddNounmagam;
egymaguk AddNounmagam;
néhányadmagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
néhányadmagad AddNounmagam;
néhányadmaga AddNounmagam;
néhányadmagunk AddNounmagam;
néhányadmagatok AddNounmagam;
néhányadmaguk AddNounmagam;
önmagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
önmagad AddNounmagam;
önmaga AddNounmagam;
önmagunk AddNounmagam;
önmagatok AddNounmagam;
önmaguk AddNounmagam;
önnönmagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
önnönmagad AddNounmagam;
önnönmaga AddNounmagam;
önnönmagunk AddNounmagam;
önnönmagatok AddNounmagam;
önnönmaguk AddNounmagam;
enmagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
enmagad AddNounmagam;
enmaga AddNounmagam;
enmagunk AddNounmagam;
enmagatok AddNounmagam;
enmaguk AddNounmagam;
tenmagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
tenmagad AddNounmagam;
tenmaga AddNounmagam;
tenmagunk AddNounmagam;
tenmagatok AddNounmagam;
tenmaguk AddNounmagam;
magamagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
magamagad AddNounmagam;
magamaga AddNounmagam;
magamagunk AddNounmagam;
magamagatok AddNounmagam;
magamaguk AddNounmagam;
másodmagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
másodmagad AddNounmagam;
másodmaga AddNounmagam;
másodmagunk AddNounmagam;
másodmagatok AddNounmagam;
másodmaguk AddNounmagam;
harmadmagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
harmadmagad AddNounmagam;
harmadmaga AddNounmagam;
harmadmagunk AddNounmagam;
harmadmagatok AddNounmagam;
harmadmaguk AddNounmagam;
negyedmagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
negyedmagad AddNounmagam;
negyedmaga AddNounmagam;
negyedmagunk AddNounmagam;
negyedmagatok AddNounmagam;
negyedmaguk AddNounmagam;
!
ezredmagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
ezredmagad AddNounmagam;
ezredmaga AddNounmagam;
ezredmagunk AddNounmagam;
ezredmagatok AddNounmagam;
ezredmaguk AddNounmagam;
hányadmagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
hányadmagad AddNounmagam;
hányadmaga AddNounmagam;
hányadmagunk AddNounmagam;
hányadmagatok AddNounmagam;
hányadmaguk AddNounmagam;
sajátmagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
sajátmagad AddNounmagam;
sajátmaga AddNounmagam;
sajátmagunk AddNounmagam;
sajátmagatok AddNounmagam;
sajátmaguk AddNounmagam;
századmagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
századmagad AddNounmagam;
századmaga AddNounmagam;
századmagunk AddNounmagam;
századmagatok AddNounmagam;
századmaguk AddNounmagam;
mindmagam AddNounmagam; !visszaható névmás
mindmagad AddNounmagam;
mindmaga AddNounmagam;
mindmagunk AddNounmagam;
mindmagatok AddNounmagam;
mindmaguk AddNounmagam;



!< [ [[b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z]^{0,4} [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő]^{1,3} ] | [ [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z]^{0,4} [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő]^{1,3}  [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z]^{1,4} [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő]^{0,3} ]* ] >    AddNoun;

LEXICON AddNounmagam
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fammagam;
        
LEXICON Fammagam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmagam;
                       Genmagam;

LEXICON Genmagam
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casemagam;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemagam;
                       Casemagam;
 
LEXICON Casemagam
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor


LEXICON AddNounenyem
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurenyem;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famenyem;


LEXICON Plurenyem
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genenyem;
                            Genenyem;
        
LEXICON Famenyem
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genenyem;
                       Genenyem;

LEXICON Genenyem
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseenyem;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseenyem;
                       Caseenyem;
 
LEXICON Caseenyem
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
